Nevada, session 83, SB443.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 338 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 and 3 of this act.
Sec. 2. The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the
payment of prevailing wages to workers employed by a contractor
or subcontractor to perform construction work on a significant
operational or capital requirement project awarded by a public
utility is essential to:
1. Increasing the number of skilled construction workers in
this State;
2. Ensuring the highest quality of work on such projects;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
3. Ensuring the safe and timely completion of such projects;
4. Ensuring that the residents of this State have access to
safe, reliable and affordable energy resources; and
5. Enhancing public safety.
Sec. 3. 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, the
provisions of NRS 338.013 to 338.090, inclusive, apply to any
contract for construction work awarded by a public utility to a
contractor or subcontractor on a significant operational or capital
requirement project when the construction work does not qualify
as a public work as defined in NRS 338.010.
2. The provisions of subsection 1 do not apply to a contract
awarded by an electric utility where the primary construction work
will be performed by a contractor with:
(a) A collective bargaining agreement;
(b) A project labor agreement; or
(c) A worksite agreement that provides for the construction of
a significant operational or capital requirement project, or for the
maintenance of, or other ongoing work to be performed upon
completion of, a significant operational or capital requirement
project.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Electric utility” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 704.7571.
(b) “Public utility” means a utility that purchases natural gas
for retail or an electric utility.
(c) “Significant operational or capital requirement project”
means:
(1) The replacement of a natural gas pipeline approved in a
plan submitted pursuant to NRS 704.991; or
(2) The construction of a new generation electric utility
facility of not less than 50 megawatts and that is approved in a
plan submitted pursuant to NRS 704.741.
Sec. 4. The provisions of section 3 of this act do not apply to
any contract entered into before October 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)